Illinois, session 104th, HB4936.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 10-1-7, 10-1-7.1, 10-1-12, 10-2.1-6, 610-2.1-6.3, and 10-2.1-14 as follows: 7    (65 ILCS 5/10-1-7)  (from Ch. 24, par. 10-1-7)8    Sec. 10-1-7. Examination of applicants; disqualifications. 9    (a) All applicants for offices or places in the classified 10service, except those mentioned in Section 10-1-17, are 11subject to examination. The examination shall be public, 12competitive, and open to all citizens of the United States, 13with specified limitations as to residence, age, health, 14habits, and moral character. An individual who is not a 15citizen but is legally authorized to work in the United States 16under federal law or is an individual against whom immigration 17action has been deferred by the U.S. Citizenship and 18Immigration Services under the federal Deferred Action for 19Childhood Arrivals (DACA) process is authorized to apply for 20the position of police officer, subject to (i) all 21requirements and limitations, other than citizenship, to which 22other applicants are subject and (ii) the individual being 23authorized under federal law to obtain, carry, or purchase or   HB4936- 2 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1otherwise possess a firearm.2    (b) Residency requirements in effect at the time an 3individual enters the fire or police service of a municipality 4(other than a municipality that has more than 1,000,000 5inhabitants) cannot be made more restrictive for that 6individual during his or her period of service for that 7municipality, or be made a condition of promotion, except for 8the rank or position of Fire or Police Chief. 9    (c) No person with a record of misdemeanor convictions 10except those under Sections 11-1.50, 11-6, 11-7, 11-9, 11-14, 1111-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 11-30, 11-35, 12-2, 12-6, 12-15, 1214-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 31-4, 1331-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, and 32-8, subdivisions 14(a)(1) and (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, and paragraphs (1), 15(6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the Criminal 16Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or arrested for any 17cause but not convicted on that cause shall be disqualified 18from taking the examination on grounds of habits or moral 19character, unless the person is attempting to qualify for a 20position on the police department, in which case the 21conviction or arrest may be considered as a factor in 22determining the person's habits or moral character.23    (d) Persons entitled to military preference under Section 2410-1-16 shall not be subject to limitations specifying age 25unless (1) they are applicants for a position as a fireman or a 26policeman having no previous employment status as a fireman or   HB4936- 3 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1policeman in the regularly constituted fire or police 2department of the municipality, in which case they must not 3have attained their 35th birthday, except any person who has 4served as an auxiliary police officer under Section 3.1-30-20 5for at least 5 years and is under 40 years of age or (2) they 6are applicants for a position as a fireman having no previous 7employment status as a fireman in the regularly constituted 8fire department of the municipality, in which case they must 9not have attained their 37th birthday.. 10    (e) All employees of a municipality of less than 500,000 11population (except those who would be excluded from the 12classified service as provided in this Division 1) who are 13holding that employment as of the date a municipality adopts 14this Division 1, or as of July 17, 1959, whichever date is the 15later, and who have held that employment for at least 2 years 16immediately before that later date, and all firemen and 17policemen regardless of length of service who were either 18appointed to their respective positions by the board of fire 19and police commissioners under the provisions of Division 2 of 20this Article or who are serving in a position (except as a 21temporary employee) in the fire or police department in the 22municipality on the date a municipality adopts this Division 231, or as of July 17, 1959, whichever date is the later, shall 24become members of the classified civil service of the 25municipality without examination.26    (f) The examinations shall be practical in their   HB4936- 4 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1character, and shall relate to those matters that will fairly 2test the relative capacity of the persons examined to 3discharge the duties of the positions to which they seek to be 4appointed. The examinations shall include tests of physical 5qualifications, health, and (when appropriate) manual skill. 6If an applicant is unable to pass the physical examination 7solely as the result of an injury received by the applicant as 8the result of the performance of an act of duty while working 9as a temporary employee in the position for which he or she is 10being examined, however, the physical examination shall be 11waived and the applicant shall be considered to have passed 12the examination. No questions in any examination shall relate 13to political or religious opinions or affiliations. Results of 14examinations and the eligible registers prepared from the 15results shall be published by the commission within 60 days 16after any examinations are held.17    (g) The commission shall control all examinations, and 18may, whenever an examination is to take place, designate a 19suitable number of persons, either in or not in the official 20service of the municipality, to be examiners. The examiners 21shall conduct the examinations as directed by the commission 22and shall make a return or report of the examinations to the 23commission. If the appointed examiners are in the official 24service of the municipality, the examiners shall not receive 25extra compensation for conducting the examinations unless the 26examiners are subject to a collective bargaining agreement   HB4936- 5 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1with the municipality. The commission may at any time 2substitute any other person, whether or not in the service of 3the municipality, in the place of any one selected as an 4examiner. The commission members may themselves at any time 5act as examiners without appointing examiners. The examiners 6at any examination shall not all be members of the same 7political party.8    (h) In municipalities of 500,000 or more population, (1) 9no person who has attained his or her 35th birthday shall be 10eligible to take an examination for a position as a fireman or 11a policeman unless the person has had previous employment 12status as a policeman or fireman in the regularly constituted 13police or fire department of the municipality, except as 14provided in this Section and (2) no person who has attained his 15or her 37th birthday shall be eligible to take an examination 16for a position as a fireman unless the person has had previous 17employment status as a fireman in the regularly constituted 18fire department of the municipality, except as provided in 19this Section..20    (i) In municipalities of more than 5,000 but not more than 21200,000 inhabitants, (1) no person who has attained his or her 2235th birthday shall be eligible to take an examination for a 23position as a fireman or a policeman unless the person has had 24previous employment status as a policeman or fireman in the 25regularly constituted police or fire department of the 26municipality, except as provided in this Section (2) no person   HB4936- 6 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1who has attained his or her 37th birthday shall be eligible to 2take an examination for a position as a fireman unless the 3person has had previous employment status as a fireman in the 4regularly constituted fire department of the municipality, 5except as provided in this Section..6    (j) In all municipalities, applicants who are 20 years of 7age and who have successfully completed 2 years of law 8enforcement studies at an accredited college or university may 9be considered for appointment to active duty with the police 10department. An applicant described in this subsection (j) who 11is appointed to active duty shall not have power of arrest, nor 12shall the applicant be permitted to carry firearms, until he 13or she reaches 21 years of age.14    (k) In municipalities of more than 500,000 population, 15applications for examination for and appointment to positions 16as firefighters or police shall be made available at various 17branches of the public library of the municipality.18    (l) No municipality having a population less than 191,000,000 shall require that any fireman appointed to the 20lowest rank serve a probationary employment period of longer 21than one year. The limitation on periods of probationary 22employment provided in Public Act 86-990 is an exclusive power 23and function of the State. Pursuant to subsection (h) of 24Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution, a home 25rule municipality having a population less than 1,000,000 must 26comply with this limitation on periods of probationary   HB4936- 7 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1employment, which is a denial and limitation of home rule 2powers. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 3Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 4extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 5employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 6sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 7hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 8licensure.9    (m) To the extent that this Section or any other Section in 10this Division conflicts with Section 10-1-7.1 or 10-1-7.2, 11then Section 10-1-7.1 or 10-1-7.2 shall control.12(Source: P.A. 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-357, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (65 ILCS 5/10-1-7.1)14    Sec. 10-1-7.1. Original appointments; full-time fire 15department.16    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 17the provisions of Section 10-1-7.2, this Section shall apply 18to all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 19department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to 20be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 21years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 2297-251).23    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law 24to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 25department to which this Section applies shall be administered   HB4936- 8 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1in the manner provided for in this Section. Provisions of the 2Illinois Municipal Code, municipal ordinances, and rules 3adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 4initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall 5continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this 6Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 7and any other law, this Section shall control.8    A home rule or non-home rule municipality may not 9administer its fire department process for original 10appointments in a manner that is less stringent than this 11Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 12Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 13concurrent exercise by home rule units of the powers and 14functions exercised by the State.15    A municipality that is operating under a court order or 16consent decree regarding original appointments to a full-time 17fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective date of 18Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of this 19Section for the duration of the court order or consent decree. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 21(a), this Section does not apply to a municipality with more 22than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 23    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made 24to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of 25eligibles established in accordance with the processes 26established by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed   HB4936- 9 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1the performance standards required by this Section shall be 2placed on a register of eligibles for original appointment to 3an affected fire department.4    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire 5a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a 6firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 7position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion, 8death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 9any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 10that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 11eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 12conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 13minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 14authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 15the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has 16the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 17either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 18register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 19highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 20of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 21eligibles is less than 5 people.22    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 23losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any 24candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list 25by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 26not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in   HB4936- 10 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1future examinations, including an examination held during the 2time a candidate is already on the municipality's register of 3eligibles.4    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 5shall be vested in the Civil Service Commission. All 6certificates of appointment issued to any officer or member of 7an affected department shall be signed by the chairperson and 8secretary, respectively, of the commission upon appointment of 9such officer or member to the affected department by the 10commission. After being selected from the register of 11eligibles to fill a vacancy in the affected department, each 12appointee shall be presented with his or her certificate of 13appointment on the day on which he or she is sworn in as a 14classified member of the affected department. Firefighters who 15were not issued a certificate of appointment when originally 16appointed shall be provided with a certificate within 10 days 17after making a written request to the chairperson of the Civil 18Service Commission. Each person who accepts a certificate of 19appointment and successfully completes his or her probationary 20period shall be enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular 21member of the fire department.22    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 23person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the 24effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 25department or fire protection district or employed by a State 26university and sworn or commissioned to perform firefighter   HB4936- 11 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1duties or paramedic duties, or both, except that the following 2persons are not included: part-time firefighters; auxiliary, 3reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including paid-on-call 4firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other civilian 5employees of a fire department or fire protection district who 6are not routinely expected to perform firefighter duties; and 7elected officials.8    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 9The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 10identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 11aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 12of members of the fire department in order to provide the 13highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 14applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 15department shall be subject to examination and testing which 16shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 17unless the municipality shall by ordinance limit applicants to 18residents of the municipality, county or counties in which the 19municipality is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 20testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this 21Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 22and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 23Municipalities may establish educational, emergency medical 24service licensure, and other prerequisites for participation 25in an examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any 26municipality may charge a fee to cover the costs of the   HB4936- 12 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1application process.2    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 3enters the fire service of a municipality cannot be made more 4restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 5service for that municipality, or be made a condition of 6promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and 7for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 8of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 9the Fire Department Promotion Act.10    No person who is 37 35 years of age or older shall be 11eligible to take an examination for a position as a 12firefighter unless the person has had previous employment 13status as a firefighter in the regularly constituted fire 14department of the municipality, except as provided in this 15Section. The age limitation does not apply to:16        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 17    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 18    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located 19    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 20    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section 21    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 22    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 23    protection district,24        (2) any person who has served a municipality as a 25    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time 26    firefighter, or  HB4936- 13 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1        (3) any person who turned 37 35 while serving as a 2    member of the active or reserve components of any of the 3    branches of the Armed Forces of the United States or the 4    National Guard of any state, whose service was 5    characterized as honorable or under honorable, if 6    separated from the military, and is currently under the 7    age of 40. 8    No person who is under 18 21 years of age shall be eligible 9for employment as a firefighter.10    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 11political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 12examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 13municipality or their designees and agents.14    No municipality shall require that any firefighter 15appointed to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment 16period of longer than one year of actual active employment, 17which may exclude periods of training, or injury or illness 18leaves, including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar 19days. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 20Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 21extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 22employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 23sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 24hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 25licensure.26    In the event that any applicant who has been found   HB4936- 14 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon 2the final eligibility register provided for in this Division 1 3has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 4year after the date of his or her physical ability 5examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 6be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or 7her appointment. If, after the second examination, the 8physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 9than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 10commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 11applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 12candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 13certification and appointment that applicant may be again 14examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 15ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum 16standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 17shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 18removed from the register.19    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of 20the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 21subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 22given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks 23preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 24published in the municipality, or if no newspaper is published 25therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 26circulation within the municipality, or (ii) on the   HB4936- 15 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1municipality's Internet website. Additional notice of the 2examination may be given as the commission shall prescribe.3    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 4firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 5ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 6aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall 7determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on 8the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 9include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 10determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 11be made available to the public.12    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 13least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 14education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 15Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based 16upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 17in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 18capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 19performed by members of a fire department. Written 20examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 21the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.22    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 23undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 24the essential functions included in the duties they may be 25called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 26the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job   HB4936- 16 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 2called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 3frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 4department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 5in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 6for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 7competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 8each applicant's physical abilities in the following 9dimensions:10        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 11    that may be required in the performance of duties 12    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 13    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 14    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 15    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 16    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 17    local appointing authority.18        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 19    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 20    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 21    environments.22        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 23    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 24    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 25    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 26    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.  HB4936- 17 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 2capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 3industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 4approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 5of the State Fire Marshal.6    Physical ability examinations administered under this 7Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of 8proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 9reasonable regulations of the commission.10    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 11authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 12person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 13passage of the written examination or the passage of the 14written examination and the physical ability component. 15Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum 16score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 17the commission so as to demonstrate a candidate's ability to 18perform the essential functions of the job. The minimum score 19set by the commission shall be supported by appropriate 20validation evidence and shall comply with all applicable State 21and federal laws. The appointing authority may conduct the 22physical ability component and any subjective components 23subsequent to the posting of the preliminary eligibility 24register.25    The examination components for an initial eligibility 26register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's   HB4936- 18 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i) 2the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 3successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 4the person's results on any subjective component as described 5in subsection (d). 6    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 7register, an applicant's score on the written examination, 8before any applicable preference points or subjective points 9are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score set by the 10commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 11score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 12register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 13score set by the commission.14    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 15persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score 16for passage and who have passed the physical ability 17examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 18as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 19on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 20aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 21the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more 22than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 23list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 24the final grades of the candidates without reference to 25priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for 26preference credit.  HB4936- 19 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including 2without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 3register is established and before it expires with the 4candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 5examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 6initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission 7showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 8to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 9preference credit.10    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:11        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 12    the military service of the United States for a period of 13    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 14    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 15    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval 16    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 17    employment with the fire department of an affected 18    department.19        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have 20    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 21    or cadet training within a cadet program established under 22    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 23    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 24    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 25    employment with the fire department.26        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have   HB4936- 20 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field 2    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 3    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 4    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 5    the fire department.6        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a 7    license as a paramedic may be preferred for appointment to 8    and employment with the fire department of an affected 9    department providing emergency medical services.10        (5) Experience preference. All persons employed by a 11    municipality who have been paid-on-call or part-time 12    certified Firefighter II, certified Firefighter III, State 13    of Illinois or nationally licensed EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 14    paramedic, or any combination of those capacities may be 15    awarded up to a maximum of 5 points. However, the 16    applicant may not be awarded more than 0.5 points for each 17    complete year of paid-on-call or part-time service. 18    Applicants from outside the municipality who were employed 19    as full-time firefighters or firefighter-paramedics by a 20    fire protection district or another municipality may be 21    awarded up to 5 experience preference points. However, the 22    applicant may not be awarded more than one point for each 23    complete year of full-time service.24        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of 25    the municipality or in the case of applicants from outside 26    the municipality the governing body of any fire protection   HB4936- 21 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    district or any other municipality shall certify to the 2    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 3    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 4    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 5    receive the full amount of preference points under this 6    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the 7    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 8    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 9    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due 10    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 11    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 12    based on the totals received if all points under this 13    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the 14    list shall be determined by lot. 15        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 16    residence is located within the fire department's 17    jurisdiction may be preferred for appointment to and 18    employment with the fire department.19        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 20    preference points may be awarded for unique categories 21    based on an applicant's experience or background as 22    identified by the commission.23        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 24    performed fire suppression service for a department as a 25    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the 26    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter   HB4936- 22 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    specified in this Section may be awarded up to 20 2    preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 3    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 4    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 5    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 6    suppression work must be in accordance with Section 7    10-1-14 of this Division and the terms established by a 8    Joint Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 9    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its 10    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 11    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 12    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 13    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance, 14    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 15    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 16    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 17    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 18    components of the examination. 19        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission shall give 20    preference for original appointment to persons designated 21    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive 22    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 23    commission may give preference for original appointment to 24    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final 25    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint 26    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The   HB4936- 23 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    commission shall determine the number of preference points 2    for each category, except items (1) and (7.5). The number 3    of preference points for each category shall range from 0 4    to 5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 5    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 6    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points 7    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 8    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 9    preference for original appointment to persons designated 10    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 11    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 12    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 13    applied by the commission in determining the final 14    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 15    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 16    total number of preference points awarded under this 17    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 18    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 19    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 20    addition to other preference points awarded by the 21    commission. 22    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 23claim the credit before any examination held under the 24provisions of this Section, but the preference shall be given 25after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility 26list or register at the request of a person entitled to a   HB4936- 24 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1credit before any certification or appointments are made from 2the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 3evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 4who are eligible for preference credit shall make a claim in 5writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 6eligibility list, or the claim shall be deemed waived. Final 7eligibility registers shall be established after the awarding 8of verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 9credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final 10eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 11upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 12the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 13eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All 14employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 15background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 16history, employment history, moral character, oral 17examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 18on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 19examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 20after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.21    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the 22age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 23shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 24abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period 25of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 37 35 years 26shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise   HB4936- 25 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1provided in this Section.2    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 3for original appointment after the names have been on the list 4for more than 2 years.5    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 6fire department unless he or she is a person of good character; 7not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 8convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 9However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to 10the fire department because of the person's record of 11misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 1211-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 1312-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 1431-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 15(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 16Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 17for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 18is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 19violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 20provided.21    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who 22is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 23fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 24furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal 25Bureau of Investigation by the commission.26    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to   HB4936- 26 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1consider some aspect of criminal history record information 2for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 3responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 4conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 5Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 6Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish, 7pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 8in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.9    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage 10of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 11prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 12commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 13only until regular appointments are made under the provisions 14of this Division, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 15appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 16any calendar year.17    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 18questions or answers before a written examination, or 19otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 20this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 21subject to charges for official misconduct.22    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 23in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 24examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 25was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 26disciplinary actions.  HB4936- 27 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 2102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 35-13-22.) 4    (65 ILCS 5/10-1-12)  (from Ch. 24, par. 10-1-12)5    Sec. 10-1-12. Register; eligibility list. From the returns 6or reports of the examiners, or from the examinations made by 7the commission, the commission shall prepare a register for 8each grade or class of positions in the classified service of 9such municipality of the persons whose general average 10standing upon examination for such grade or class is not less 11than the minimum fixed by the rules of such commission, and who 12are otherwise eligible. Such persons shall take rank upon the 13register as candidates in the order of their relative 14excellence as determined by examination, without reference to 15priority of time of examination.16    Within 60 days after each examination, an eligibility list 17shall be posted by the Commission, which shall show the final 18grades of the candidates without reference to priority of time 19of examination and subject to claim for military credit. 20Candidates who are eligible for military credit shall make a 21claim in writing within 10 days after posting of the 22eligibility list or such claim shall be deemed waived. 23Appointment shall be subject to a final physical examination.24    If a person is placed on an eligibility list and becomes 25overage before he or she is appointed to a police or fire   HB4936- 28 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1department, the person remains eligible for appointment until 2the list is abolished pursuant to authorized procedures. 3Otherwise no person who has attained the age of 36 years shall 4be inducted as a member of a police department and no person 5who has attained the age of 37 35 years shall be inducted as a 6member of a fire department, except as otherwise provided in 7this division. With respect to a police department, a veteran 8shall be allowed to exceed the maximum age provision of this 9Section by the number of years served on active military duty, 10but by no more than 10 years of active military duty. 11(Source: P.A. 96-472, eff. 8-14-09.) 12    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-6)  (from Ch. 24, par. 10-2.1-6)13    Sec. 10-2.1-6. Examination of applicants; 14disqualifications. 15    (a) All applicants for a position in either the fire or 16police department of the municipality shall be under 35 years 17of age. All applicants for a position in the fire department of 18the municipality shall be under 37 years of age. All 19applicants for a position in either the fire or police 20department , shall be subject to an examination that shall be 21public, competitive, and open to all applicants (unless the 22council or board of trustees by ordinance limits limit 23applicants to electors of the municipality, county, state, or 24nation) and shall be subject to reasonable limitations as to 25residence, health, habits, and moral character. An individual   HB4936- 29 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1who is not a citizen but is legally authorized to work in the 2United States under federal law or is an individual against 3whom immigration action has been deferred by the U.S. 4Citizenship and Immigration Services under the federal 5Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) process is 6authorized to apply for the position of police officer, 7subject to (i) all requirements and limitations, other than 8citizenship, to which other applicants are subject and (ii) 9the individual being authorized under federal law to obtain, 10carry, or purchase or otherwise possess a firearm. The 11municipality may not charge or collect any fee from an 12applicant who has met all prequalification standards 13established by the municipality for any such position. With 14respect to a police department, a veteran shall be allowed to 15exceed the maximum age provision of this Section by the number 16of years served on active military duty, but by no more than 10 17years of active military duty. 18    (b) Residency requirements in effect at the time an 19individual enters the fire or police service of a municipality 20(other than a municipality that has more than 1,000,000 21inhabitants) cannot be made more restrictive for that 22individual during his period of service for that municipality, 23or be made a condition of promotion, except for the rank or 24position of Fire or Police Chief. 25    (c) No person with a record of misdemeanor convictions 26except those under Sections 11-1.50, 11-6, 11-7, 11-9, 11-14,   HB4936- 30 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b111-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 11-30, 11-35, 12-2, 12-6, 12-15, 214-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 31-4, 331-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, and 32-8, subdivisions 4(a)(1) and (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, and paragraphs (1), 5(6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the Criminal 6Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrested for any 7cause but not convicted on that cause shall be disqualified 8from taking the examination to qualify for a position in the 9fire department on grounds of habits or moral character.10    (d) The age limitation in subsection (a) does not apply 11(i) to any person previously employed as a policeman or 12fireman in a regularly constituted police or fire department 13of (I) any municipality, regardless of whether the 14municipality is located in Illinois or in another state, or 15(II) a fire protection district whose obligations were assumed 16by a municipality under Section 21 of the Fire Protection 17District Act, (ii) to any person who has served a municipality 18as a regularly enrolled volunteer fireman for 5 years 19immediately preceding the time that municipality begins to use 20full time firemen to provide all or part of its fire protection 21service, or (iii) to any person who has served as an auxiliary 22police officer under Section 3.1-30-20 for at least 5 years 23and is under 40 years of age, (iv) to any person who has served 24as a deputy under Section 3-6008 of the Counties Code and 25otherwise meets necessary training requirements, or (v) to any 26person who has served as a sworn officer as a member of the   HB4936- 31 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1Illinois State Police.2    (e) Applicants who are 20 years of age and who have 3successfully completed 2 years of law enforcement studies at 4an accredited college or university may be considered for 5appointment to active duty with the police department. An 6applicant described in this subsection (e) who is appointed to 7active duty shall not have power of arrest, nor shall the 8applicant be permitted to carry firearms, until he or she 9reaches 21 years of age.10    (f) Applicants who are 18 years of age and who have 11successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques, 12amounting to a total of 4 high school credits, within the cadet 13program of a municipality may be considered for appointment to 14active duty with the fire department of any municipality. 15    (g) The council or board of trustees may by ordinance 16provide that persons residing outside the municipality are 17eligible to take the examination. 18    (h) The examinations shall be practical in character and 19relate to those matters that will fairly test the capacity of 20the persons examined to discharge the duties of the positions 21to which they seek appointment. No person shall be appointed 22to the police or fire department if he or she does not possess 23a high school diploma or an equivalent high school education. 24A board of fire and police commissioners may, by its rules, 25require police applicants to have obtained an associate's 26degree or a bachelor's degree as a prerequisite for   HB4936- 32 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1employment. The examinations shall include tests of physical 2qualifications and health. A board of fire and police 3commissioners may, by its rules, waive portions of the 4required examination for police applicants who have previously 5been full-time sworn officers of a regular police department 6in any municipal, county, university, or State law enforcement 7agency, provided they are certified by the Illinois Law 8Enforcement Training Standards Board and have been with their 9respective law enforcement agency within the State for at 10least 2 years. No person shall be appointed to the police or 11fire department if he or she has suffered the amputation of any 12limb unless the applicant's duties will be only clerical or as 13a radio operator. No applicant shall be examined concerning 14his or her political or religious opinions or affiliations. 15The examinations shall be conducted by the board of fire and 16police commissioners of the municipality as provided in this 17Division 2.1.18    The requirement that a police applicant possess an 19associate's degree under this subsection may be waived if one 20or more of the following applies: (1) the applicant has served 21for 24 months of honorable active duty in the United States 22Armed Forces and has not been discharged dishonorably or under 23circumstances other than honorable; (2) the applicant has 24served for 180 days of active duty in the United States Armed 25Forces in combat duty recognized by the Department of Defense 26and has not been discharged dishonorably or under   HB4936- 33 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1circumstances other than honorable; or (3) the applicant has 2successfully received credit for a minimum of 60 credit hours 3toward a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or 4university.5    The requirement that a police applicant possess a 6bachelor's degree under this subsection may be waived if one 7or more of the following applies: (1) the applicant has served 8for 36 months of honorable active duty in the United States 9Armed Forces and has not been discharged dishonorably or under 10circumstances other than honorable or (2) the applicant has 11served for 180 days of active duty in the United States Armed 12Forces in combat duty recognized by the Department of Defense 13and has not been discharged dishonorably or under 14circumstances other than honorable. 15    (i) No person who is classified by his local selective 16service draft board as a conscientious objector, or who has 17ever been so classified, may be appointed to the police 18department.19    (j) No person shall be appointed to the police or fire 20department unless he or she is a person of good character and 21not an habitual drunkard, gambler, or a person who has been 22convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. No 23person, however, shall be disqualified from appointment to the 24fire department because of his or her record of misdemeanor 25convictions except those under Sections 11-1.50, 11-6, 11-7, 2611-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 11-30, 11-35, 12-2,   HB4936- 34 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b112-6, 12-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 231-1, 31-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, and 32-8, 3subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, and 4paragraphs (1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 5of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or 6arrest for any cause without conviction on that cause. Any 7such person who is in the department may be removed on charges 8brought and after a trial as provided in this Division 2.1.9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 10103-357, eff. 1-1-24; revised 7-7-25.) 11    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-6.3)12    Sec. 10-2.1-6.3. Original appointments; full-time fire 13department.14    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 15the provisions of Section 10-2.1-6.4, this Section shall apply 16to all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 17department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to 18be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 19years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 2097-251).21    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law 22to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 23department to which this Section applies shall be administered 24in the manner provided for in this Section. Provisions of the 25Illinois Municipal Code, municipal ordinances, and rules   HB4936- 35 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 2initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall 3continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this 4Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 5and any other law, this Section shall control.6    A home rule or non-home rule municipality may not 7administer its fire department process for original 8appointments in a manner that is less stringent than this 9Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 10Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 11concurrent exercise by home rule units of the powers and 12functions exercised by the State.13    A municipality that is operating under a court order or 14consent decree regarding original appointments to a full-time 15fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective date of 16Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of this 17Section for the duration of the court order or consent decree.18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection 19(a), this Section does not apply to a municipality with more 20than 1,000,000 inhabitants. 21    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made 22to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of 23eligibles established in accordance with the processes 24established by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed 25the performance standards required by this Section shall be 26placed on a register of eligibles for original appointment to   HB4936- 36 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1an affected fire department.2    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire 3a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a 4firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 5position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion, 6death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 7any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 8that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 9eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 10conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 11minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 12authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 13the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has 14the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 15either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 16register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 17highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 18of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 19eligibles is less than 5 people.20    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 21losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any 22candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list 23by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 24not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in 25future examinations, including an examination held during the 26time a candidate is already on the municipality's register of   HB4936- 37 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1eligibles.2    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 3shall be vested in the board of fire and police commissioners. 4All certificates of appointment issued to any officer or 5member of an affected department shall be signed by the 6chairperson and secretary, respectively, of the board upon 7appointment of such officer or member to the affected 8department by action of the board. After being selected from 9the register of eligibles to fill a vacancy in the affected 10department, each appointee shall be presented with his or her 11certificate of appointment on the day on which he or she is 12sworn in as a classified member of the affected department. 13Firefighters who were not issued a certificate of appointment 14when originally appointed shall be provided with a certificate 15within 10 days after making a written request to the 16chairperson of the board of fire and police commissioners. 17Each person who accepts a certificate of appointment and 18successfully completes his or her probationary period shall be 19enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular member of the fire 20department.21    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 22person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the 23effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 24department or fire protection district or employed by a State 25university and sworn or commissioned to perform firefighter 26duties or paramedic duties, or both, except that the following   HB4936- 38 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1persons are not included: part-time firefighters; auxiliary, 2reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including paid-on-call 3firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other civilian 4employees of a fire department or fire protection district who 5are not routinely expected to perform firefighter duties; and 6elected officials.7    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 8The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 9identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 10aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 11of members of the fire department in order to provide the 12highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 13applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 14department shall be subject to examination and testing which 15shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 16unless the municipality shall by ordinance limit applicants to 17residents of the municipality, county or counties in which the 18municipality is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 19testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this 20Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 21and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 22Municipalities may establish educational, emergency medical 23service licensure, and other prerequisites for participation 24in an examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any 25municipality may charge a fee to cover the costs of the 26application process.  HB4936- 39 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 2enters the fire service of a municipality cannot be made more 3restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 4service for that municipality, or be made a condition of 5promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and 6for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 7of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 8the Fire Department Promotion Act.9    No person who is 37 35 years of age or older shall be 10eligible to take an examination for a position as a 11firefighter unless the person has had previous employment 12status as a firefighter in the regularly constituted fire 13department of the municipality, except as provided in this 14Section. The age limitation does not apply to:15        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 16    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 17    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located 18    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 19    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section 20    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 21    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 22    protection district,23        (2) any person who has served a municipality as a 24    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time 25    firefighter, or26        (3) any person who turned 37 35 while serving as a   HB4936- 40 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    member of the active or reserve components of any of the 2    branches of the Armed Forces of the United States or the 3    National Guard of any state, whose service was 4    characterized as honorable or under honorable, if 5    separated from the military, and is currently under the 6    age of 40. 7    No person who is under 18 21 years of age shall be eligible 8for employment as a firefighter.9    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 10political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 11examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 12municipality or their designees and agents.13    No municipality shall require that any firefighter 14appointed to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment 15period of longer than one year of actual active employment, 16which may exclude periods of training, or injury or illness 17leaves, including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar 18days. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 19Section, the probationary employment period limitation may be 20extended for a firefighter who is required, as a condition of 21employment, to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the 22sole reason that a firefighter may be discharged without a 23hearing is for failing to meet the requirements for paramedic 24licensure.25    In the event that any applicant who has been found 26eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon   HB4936- 41 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1the final eligibility register provided for in this Section 2has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 3year after the date of his or her physical ability 4examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 5be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or 6her appointment. If, after the second examination, the 7physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 8than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 9commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 10applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 11candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 12certification and appointment that applicant may be again 13examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 14ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum 15standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 16shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 17removed from the register.18    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of 19the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 20subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 21given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks 22preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 23published in the municipality, or if no newspaper is published 24therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 25circulation within the municipality, or (ii) on the 26municipality's Internet website. Additional notice of the   HB4936- 42 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1examination may be given as the commission shall prescribe.2    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 3firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 4ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 5aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall 6determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on 7the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 8include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 9determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 10be made available to the public.11    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 12least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 13education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 14Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based 15upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 16in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 17capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 18performed by members of a fire department. Written 19examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 20the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.21    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 22undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 23the essential functions included in the duties they may be 24called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For 25the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 26are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be   HB4936- 43 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 2frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 3department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 4in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 5for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 6competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 7each applicant's physical abilities in the following 8dimensions:9        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 10    that may be required in the performance of duties 11    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 12    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 13    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 14    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 15    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 16    local appointing authority.17        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 18    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 19    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 20    environments.21        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 22    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 23    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 24    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed 25    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.26    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's   HB4936- 44 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 2industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 3approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 4of the State Fire Marshal. 5    Physical ability examinations administered under this 6Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of 7proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 8reasonable regulations of the commission.9    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 10authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 11person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 12passage of the written examination or the passage of the 13written examination and the physical ability component. 14Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum 15score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 16the commission so as to demonstrate a candidate's ability to 17perform the essential functions of the job. The minimum score 18set by the commission shall be supported by appropriate 19validation evidence and shall comply with all applicable State 20and federal laws. The appointing authority may conduct the 21physical ability component and any subjective components 22subsequent to the posting of the preliminary eligibility 23register.24    The examination components for an initial eligibility 25register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 26position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i)   HB4936- 45 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 2successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 3the person's results on any subjective component as described 4in subsection (d). 5    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 6register, an applicant's score on the written examination, 7before any applicable preference points or subjective points 8are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score as set by 9the commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe 10the score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 11register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 12score set by the commission.13    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 14persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score 15for passage and who have passed the physical ability 16examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 17as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 18on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 19aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 20the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more 21than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 22list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 23the final grades of the candidates without reference to 24priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for 25preference credit.26    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including   HB4936- 46 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 2register is established and before it expires with the 3candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 4examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 5initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission 6showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 7to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 8preference credit.9    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:10        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 11    the military service of the United States for a period of 12    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 13    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 14    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval 15    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 16    employment with the fire department of an affected 17    department.18        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have 19    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 20    or cadet training within a cadet program established under 21    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 22    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 23    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 24    employment with the fire department.25        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have 26    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field   HB4936- 47 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 2    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 3    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 4    the fire department.5        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a 6    license as a paramedic shall be preferred for appointment 7    to and employment with the fire department of an affected 8    department providing emergency medical services.9        (5) Experience preference. All persons employed by a 10    municipality who have been paid-on-call or part-time 11    certified Firefighter II, State of Illinois or nationally 12    licensed EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or any combination of those 13    capacities shall be awarded 0.5 point for each year of 14    successful service in one or more of those capacities, up 15    to a maximum of 5 points. Certified Firefighter III and 16    State of Illinois or nationally licensed paramedics shall 17    be awarded one point per year up to a maximum of 5 points. 18    Applicants from outside the municipality who were employed 19    as full-time firefighters or firefighter-paramedics by a 20    fire protection district or another municipality for at 21    least 2 years shall be awarded 5 experience preference 22    points. These additional points presuppose a rating scale 23    totaling 100 points available for the eligibility list. If 24    more or fewer points are used in the rating scale for the 25    eligibility list, the points awarded under this subsection 26    shall be increased or decreased by a factor equal to the   HB4936- 48 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    total possible points available for the examination 2    divided by 100.3        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of 4    the municipality or in the case of applicants from outside 5    the municipality the governing body of any fire protection 6    district or any other municipality shall certify to the 7    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 8    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 9    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 10    receive the full amount of preference points under this 11    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the 12    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 13    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 14    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due 15    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 16    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 17    based on the totals received if all points under this 18    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the 19    list shall be determined by lot. 20        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 21    residence is located within the fire department's 22    jurisdiction shall be preferred for appointment to and 23    employment with the fire department.24        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 25    preference points may be awarded for unique categories 26    based on an applicant's experience or background as   HB4936- 49 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    identified by the commission.2        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 3    performed fire suppression service for a department as a 4    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the 5    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter 6    specified in this Section is eligible to be awarded up to 7    20 preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 8    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 9    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 10    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 11    suppression work must be in accordance with Section 12    10-2.1-4 of this Division and the terms established by a 13    Joint Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 14    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its 15    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 16    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 17    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 18    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance, 19    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 20    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 21    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 22    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 23    components of the examination. 24        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission may give 25    preference for original appointment to persons designated 26    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive   HB4936- 50 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 2    commission may give preference for original appointment to 3    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final 4    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint 5    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The 6    commission shall determine the number of preference points 7    for each category, except items (1) and (7.5). The number 8    of preference points for each category shall range from 0 9    to 5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 10    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 11    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points 12    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 13    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 14    preference for original appointment to persons designated 15    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 16    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 17    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 18    applied by the commission in determining the final 19    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 20    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 21    total number of preference points awarded under this 22    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 23    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 24    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 25    addition to other preference points awarded by the 26    commission.   HB4936- 51 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 2claim the credit before any examination held under the 3provisions of this Section, but the preference may be given 4after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility 5list or register at the request of a person entitled to a 6credit before any certification or appointments are made from 7the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 8evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 9who are eligible for preference credit may make a claim in 10writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 11eligibility list, or the claim may be deemed waived. Final 12eligibility registers may be established after the awarding of 13verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 14credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final 15eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 16upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 17the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 18eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All 19employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 20background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 21history, employment history, moral character, oral 22examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 23on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 24examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 25after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.26    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the   HB4936- 52 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 2shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 3abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period 4of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 37 35 years 5shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise 6provided in this Section.7    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 8for original appointment after the names have been on the list 9for more than 2 years.10    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 11fire department unless he or she is a person of good character; 12not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 13convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 14However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to 15the fire department because of the person's record of 16misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 1711-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 1812-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 1931-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 20(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 21Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 22for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 23is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 24violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 25provided.26    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who   HB4936- 53 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 2fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 3furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal 4Bureau of Investigation by the commission.5    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to 6consider some aspect of criminal history record information 7for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 8responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 9conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 10Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 11Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish, 12pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 13in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.14    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage 15of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 16prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 17commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 18only until regular appointments are made under the provisions 19of this Division, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 20appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 21any calendar year.22    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 23questions or answers before a written examination, or 24otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 25this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 26subject to charges for official misconduct.  HB4936- 54 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 2in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 3examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 4was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to 5disciplinary actions.6(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 7102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 85-13-22.) 9    (65 ILCS 5/10-2.1-14)  (from Ch. 24, par. 10-2.1-14)10    Sec. 10-2.1-14. Register of eligibles. The board of fire 11and police commissioners shall prepare and keep a register of 12persons whose general average standing, upon examination, is 13not less than the minimum fixed by the rules of the board, and 14who are otherwise eligible. These persons shall take rank upon 15the register as candidates in the order of their relative 16excellence as determined by examination, without reference to 17priority of time of examination. The board of fire and police 18commissioners may prepare and keep a second register of 19persons who have previously been full-time sworn officers of a 20regular police department in any municipal, county, 21university, or State law enforcement agency, provided they are 22certified by the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards 23Board and have been with their respective law enforcement 24agency within the State for at least 2 years. The persons on 25this list shall take rank upon the register as candidates in   HB4936- 55 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1the order of their relative excellence as determined by 2members of the board of fire and police commissioners. 3Applicants who have been awarded a certificate attesting to 4their successful completion of the Minimum Standards Basic Law 5Enforcement Training Course, as provided in the Illinois 6Police Training Act, may be given preference in appointment 7over noncertified applicants. Applicants for appointment to 8fire departments who are licensed as an EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 9paramedic under the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 10Act, may be given preference in appointment over non-licensed 11applicants. 12    Within 60 days after each examination, an eligibility list 13shall be posted by the board, which shall show the final grades 14of the candidates without reference to priority of time of 15examination and subject to claim for military credit. 16Candidates who are eligible for military credit shall make a 17claim in writing within 10 days after the posting of the 18eligibility list or such claim shall be deemed waived. 19Appointment shall be subject to a final physical examination.20    If a person is placed on an eligibility list and becomes 21overage before he or she is appointed to a police or fire 22department, the person remains eligible for appointment until 23the list is abolished pursuant to authorized procedures. 24Otherwise no person who has attained the age of 36 years shall 25be inducted as a member of a police department and no person 26who has attained the age of 37 35 years shall be inducted as a   HB4936- 56 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1member of a fire department, except as otherwise provided in 2this division. With respect to a police department, a veteran 3shall be allowed to exceed the maximum age provision of this 4Section by the number of years served on active military duty, 5but by no more than 10 years of active military duty. 6(Source: P.A. 98-973, eff. 8-15-14.) 7    Section 10. The Fire Protection District Act is amended by 8changing Sections 16.06 and 16.06b as follows: 9    (70 ILCS 705/16.06)  (from Ch. 127 1/2, par. 37.06)10    Sec. 16.06. Eligibility for positions in fire department; 11disqualifications.12    (a) All applicants for a position in the fire department 13of the fire protection district shall be under 37 35 years of 14age and shall be subjected to examination, which shall be 15public, competitive, and free to all applicants, subject to 16reasonable limitations as to health, habits, and moral 17character; provided that the foregoing age limitation shall 18not apply in the case of any person having previous employment 19status as a fireman in a regularly constituted fire department 20of any fire protection district, and further provided that 21each fireman or fire chief who is a member in good standing in 22a regularly constituted fire department of any municipality 23which shall be or shall have subsequently been included within 24the boundaries of any fire protection district now or   HB4936- 57 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1hereafter organized shall be given a preference for original 2appointment in the same class, grade or employment over all 3other applicants. The examinations shall be practical in their 4character and shall relate to those matters which will fairly 5test the persons examined as to their relative capacity to 6discharge the duties of the positions to which they seek 7appointment. The examinations shall include tests of physical 8qualifications and health. No applicant, however, shall be 9examined concerning his political or religious opinions or 10affiliations. The examinations shall be conducted by the board 11of fire commissioners.12    In any fire protection district that employs full-time 13firefighters and is subject to a collective bargaining 14agreement, a person who has not qualified for regular 15appointment under the provisions of this Section shall not be 16used as a temporary or permanent substitute for certificated 17members of a fire district's fire department or for regular 18appointment as a certificated member of a fire district's fire 19department unless mutually agreed to by the employee's 20certified bargaining agent. Such agreement shall be considered 21a permissive subject of bargaining. Fire protection districts 22covered by the changes made by Public Act 95-490 that are using 23non-certificated employees as substitutes immediately prior to 24June 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-490) may, by 25mutual agreement with the certified bargaining agent, continue 26the existing practice or a modified practice and that   HB4936- 58 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1agreement shall be considered a permissive subject of 2bargaining. 3    (b) No person shall be appointed to the fire department 4unless he or she is a person of good character and not a person 5who has been convicted of a felony in Illinois or convicted in 6another jurisdiction for conduct that would be a felony under 7Illinois law, or convicted of a crime involving moral 8turpitude. No person, however, shall be disqualified from 9appointment to the fire department because of his or her 10record of misdemeanor convictions, except those under Sections 1111-1.50, 11-6, 11-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 1211-30, 11-35, 12-2, 12-6, 12-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 1324-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 31-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 1432-4, and 32-8, subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2)(C) of Section 1511-14.3, and paragraphs (1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of 16Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 17of 2012.18(Source: P.A. 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 19    (70 ILCS 705/16.06b)20    Sec. 16.06b. Original appointments; full-time fire 21department.22    (a) Applicability. Unless a commission elects to follow 23the provisions of Section 16.06c, this Section shall apply to 24all original appointments to an affected full-time fire 25department. Existing registers of eligibles shall continue to   HB4936- 59 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1be valid until their expiration dates, or up to a maximum of 2 2years after August 4, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 397-251).4    Notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, rule, or other law 5to the contrary, all original appointments to an affected 6department to which this Section applies shall be administered 7in a no less stringent manner than the manner provided for in 8this Section. Provisions of the Illinois Municipal Code, Fire 9Protection District Act, fire district ordinances, and rules 10adopted pursuant to such authority and other laws relating to 11initial hiring of firefighters in affected departments shall 12continue to apply to the extent they are compatible with this 13Section, but in the event of a conflict between this Section 14and any other law, this Section shall control.15    A fire protection district that is operating under a court 16order or consent decree regarding original appointments to a 17full-time fire department before August 4, 2011 (the effective 18date of Public Act 97-251) is exempt from the requirements of 19this Section for the duration of the court order or consent 20decree.21    (b) Original appointments. All original appointments made 22to an affected fire department shall be made from a register of 23eligibles established in accordance with the processes 24required by this Section. Only persons who meet or exceed the 25performance standards required by the Section shall be placed 26on a register of eligibles for original appointment to an   HB4936- 60 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1affected fire department.2    Whenever an appointing authority authorizes action to hire 3a person to perform the duties of a firefighter or to hire a 4firefighter-paramedic to fill a position that is a new 5position or vacancy due to resignation, discharge, promotion, 6death, the granting of a disability or retirement pension, or 7any other cause, the appointing authority shall appoint to 8that position the person with the highest ranking on the final 9eligibility list. If the appointing authority has reason to 10conclude that the highest ranked person fails to meet the 11minimum standards for the position or if the appointing 12authority believes an alternate candidate would better serve 13the needs of the department, then the appointing authority has 14the right to pass over the highest ranked person and appoint 15either: (i) any person who has a ranking in the top 5% of the 16register of eligibles or (ii) any person who is among the top 5 17highest ranked persons on the list of eligibles if the number 18of people who have a ranking in the top 5% of the register of 19eligibles is less than 5 people.20    Any candidate may pass on an appointment once without 21losing his or her position on the register of eligibles. Any 22candidate who passes a second time may be removed from the list 23by the appointing authority provided that such action shall 24not prejudice a person's opportunities to participate in 25future examinations, including an examination held during the 26time a candidate is already on the fire district's register of   HB4936- 61 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1eligibles.2    The sole authority to issue certificates of appointment 3shall be vested in the board of fire commissioners, or board of 4trustees serving in the capacity of a board of fire 5commissioners. All certificates of appointment issued to any 6officer or member of an affected department shall be signed by 7the chairperson and secretary, respectively, of the commission 8upon appointment of such officer or member to the affected 9department by action of the commission. After being selected 10from the register of eligibles to fill a vacancy in the 11affected department, each appointee shall be presented with 12his or her certificate of appointment on the day on which he or 13she is sworn in as a classified member of the affected 14department. Firefighters who were not issued a certificate of 15appointment when originally appointed shall be provided with a 16certificate within 10 days after making a written request to 17the chairperson of the board of fire commissioners, or board 18of trustees serving in the capacity of a board of fire 19commissioners. Each person who accepts a certificate of 20appointment and successfully completes his or her probationary 21period shall be enrolled as a firefighter and as a regular 22member of the fire department.23    For the purposes of this Section, "firefighter" means any 24person who has been prior to, on, or after August 4, 2011 (the 25effective date of Public Act 97-251) appointed to a fire 26department or fire protection district or employed by a State   HB4936- 62 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1university and sworn or commissioned to perform firefighter 2duties or paramedic duties, or both, except that the following 3persons are not included: part-time firefighters; auxiliary, 4reserve, or voluntary firefighters, including paid-on-call 5firefighters; clerks and dispatchers or other civilian 6employees of a fire department or fire protection district who 7are not routinely expected to perform firefighter duties; and 8elected officials.9    (c) Qualification for placement on register of eligibles. 10The purpose of establishing a register of eligibles is to 11identify applicants who possess and demonstrate the mental 12aptitude and physical ability to perform the duties required 13of members of the fire department in order to provide the 14highest quality of service to the public. To this end, all 15applicants for original appointment to an affected fire 16department shall be subject to examination and testing which 17shall be public, competitive, and open to all applicants 18unless the district shall by ordinance limit applicants to 19residents of the district, county or counties in which the 20district is located, State, or nation. Any examination and 21testing procedure utilized under subsection (e) of this 22Section shall be supported by appropriate validation evidence 23and shall comply with all applicable State and federal laws. 24Districts may establish educational, emergency medical service 25licensure, and other prerequisites for participation in an 26examination or for hire as a firefighter. Any fire protection   HB4936- 63 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1district may charge a fee to cover the costs of the application 2process.3    Residency requirements in effect at the time an individual 4enters the fire service of a district cannot be made more 5restrictive for that individual during his or her period of 6service for that district, or be made a condition of 7promotion, except for the rank or position of fire chief and 8for no more than 2 positions that rank immediately below that 9of the chief rank which are appointed positions pursuant to 10the Fire Department Promotion Act.11    No person who is 37 35 years of age or older shall be 12eligible to take an examination for a position as a 13firefighter unless the person has had previous employment 14status as a firefighter in the regularly constituted fire 15department of the district, except as provided in this 16Section. The age limitation does not apply to:17        (1) any person previously employed as a full-time 18    firefighter in a regularly constituted fire department of 19    (i) any municipality or fire protection district located 20    in Illinois, (ii) a fire protection district whose 21    obligations were assumed by a municipality under Section 22    21 of the Fire Protection District Act, or (iii) a 23    municipality whose obligations were taken over by a fire 24    protection district;25        (2) any person who has served a fire district as a 26    regularly enrolled volunteer, paid-on-call, or part-time   HB4936- 64 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    firefighter; or2        (3) any person who turned 37 35 while serving as a 3    member of the active or reserve components of any of the 4    branches of the Armed Forces of the United States or the 5    National Guard of any state, whose service was 6    characterized as honorable or under honorable, if 7    separated from the military, and is currently under the 8    age of 40. 9    No person who is under 18 21 years of age shall be eligible 10for employment as a firefighter.11    No applicant shall be examined concerning his or her 12political or religious opinions or affiliations. The 13examinations shall be conducted by the commissioners of the 14district or their designees and agents.15    No district shall require that any firefighter appointed 16to the lowest rank serve a probationary employment period of 17longer than one year of actual active employment, which may 18exclude periods of training, or injury or illness leaves, 19including duty related leave, in excess of 30 calendar days. 20Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section, the 21probationary employment period limitation may be extended for 22a firefighter who is required, as a condition of employment, 23to be a licensed paramedic, during which time the sole reason 24that a firefighter may be discharged without a hearing is for 25failing to meet the requirements for paramedic licensure.26    In the event that any applicant who has been found   HB4936- 65 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1eligible for appointment and whose name has been placed upon 2the final eligibility register provided for in this Section 3has not been appointed to a firefighter position within one 4year after the date of his or her physical ability 5examination, the commission may cause a second examination to 6be made of that applicant's physical ability prior to his or 7her appointment. If, after the second examination, the 8physical ability of the applicant shall be found to be less 9than the minimum standard fixed by the rules of the 10commission, the applicant shall not be appointed. The 11applicant's name may be retained upon the register of 12candidates eligible for appointment and when next reached for 13certification and appointment that applicant may be again 14examined as provided in this Section, and if the physical 15ability of that applicant is found to be less than the minimum 16standard fixed by the rules of the commission, the applicant 17shall not be appointed, and the name of the applicant shall be 18removed from the register.19    (d) Notice, examination, and testing components. Notice of 20the time, place, general scope, merit criteria for any 21subjective component, and fee of every examination shall be 22given by the commission, by a publication at least 2 weeks 23preceding the examination: (i) in one or more newspapers 24published in the district, or if no newspaper is published 25therein, then in one or more newspapers with a general 26circulation within the district, or (ii) on the fire   HB4936- 66 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1protection district's Internet website. Additional notice of 2the examination may be given as the commission shall 3prescribe.4    The examination and qualifying standards for employment of 5firefighters shall be based on: mental aptitude, physical 6ability, preferences, moral character, and health. The mental 7aptitude, physical ability, and preference components shall 8determine an applicant's qualification for and placement on 9the final register of eligibles. The examination may also 10include a subjective component based on merit criteria as 11determined by the commission. Scores from the examination must 12be made available to the public.13    (e) Mental aptitude. No person who does not possess at 14least a high school diploma or an equivalent high school 15education shall be placed on a register of eligibles. 16Examination of an applicant's mental aptitude shall be based 17upon a written examination. The examination shall be practical 18in character and relate to those matters that fairly test the 19capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties 20performed by members of a fire department. Written 21examinations shall be administered in a manner that ensures 22the security and accuracy of the scores achieved.23    (f) Physical ability. All candidates shall be required to 24undergo an examination of their physical ability to perform 25the essential functions included in the duties they may be 26called upon to perform as a member of a fire department. For   HB4936- 67 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1the purposes of this Section, essential functions of the job 2are functions associated with duties that a firefighter may be 3called upon to perform in response to emergency calls. The 4frequency of the occurrence of those duties as part of the fire 5department's regular routine shall not be a controlling factor 6in the design of examination criteria or evolutions selected 7for testing. These physical examinations shall be open, 8competitive, and based on industry standards designed to test 9each applicant's physical abilities in the following 10dimensions:11        (1) Muscular strength to perform tasks and evolutions 12    that may be required in the performance of duties 13    including grip strength, leg strength, and arm strength. 14    Tests shall be conducted under anaerobic as well as 15    aerobic conditions to test both the candidate's speed and 16    endurance in performing tasks and evolutions. Tasks tested 17    may be based on standards developed, or approved, by the 18    local appointing authority.19        (2) The ability to climb ladders, operate from 20    heights, walk or crawl in the dark along narrow and uneven 21    surfaces, and operate in proximity to hazardous 22    environments.23        (3) The ability to carry out critical, time-sensitive, 24    and complex problem solving during physical exertion in 25    stressful and hazardous environments. The testing 26    environment may be hot and dark with tightly enclosed   HB4936- 68 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    spaces, flashing lights, sirens, and other distractions.2    The tests utilized to measure each applicant's 3capabilities in each of these dimensions may be tests based on 4industry standards currently in use or equivalent tests 5approved by the Joint Labor-Management Committee of the Office 6of the State Fire Marshal. 7    Physical ability examinations administered under this 8Section shall be conducted with a reasonable number of 9proctors and monitors, open to the public, and subject to 10reasonable regulations of the commission.11    (g) Scoring of examination components. Appointing 12authorities may create a preliminary eligibility register. A 13person shall be placed on the list based upon his or her 14passage of the written examination or the passage of the 15written examination and the physical ability component. 16Passage of the written examination means attaining the minimum 17score set by the commission. Minimum scores should be set by 18the appointing authorities so as to demonstrate a candidate's 19ability to perform the essential functions of the job. The 20minimum score set by the commission shall be supported by 21appropriate validation evidence and shall comply with all 22applicable State and federal laws. The appointing authority 23may conduct the physical ability component and any subjective 24components subsequent to the posting of the preliminary 25eligibility register.26    The examination components for an initial eligibility   HB4936- 69 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1register shall be graded on a 100-point scale. A person's 2position on the list shall be determined by the following: (i) 3the person's score on the written examination, (ii) the person 4successfully passing the physical ability component, and (iii) 5the person's results on any subjective component as described 6in subsection (d). 7    In order to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 8register, an applicant's score on the written examination, 9before any applicable preference points or subjective points 10are applied, shall be at or above the minimum score set by the 11commission. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 12score to qualify for placement on the final eligibility 13register, but the score shall not be less than the minimum 14score set by the commission.15    The commission shall prepare and keep a register of 16persons whose total score is not less than the minimum score 17for passage and who have passed the physical ability 18examination. These persons shall take rank upon the register 19as candidates in the order of their relative excellence based 20on the highest to the lowest total points scored on the mental 21aptitude, subjective component, and preference components of 22the test administered in accordance with this Section. No more 23than 60 days after each examination, an initial eligibility 24list shall be posted by the commission. The list shall include 25the final grades of the candidates without reference to 26priority of the time of examination and subject to claim for   HB4936- 70 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1preference credit.2    Commissions may conduct additional examinations, including 3without limitation a polygraph test, after a final eligibility 4register is established and before it expires with the 5candidates ranked by total score without regard to date of 6examination. No more than 60 days after each examination, an 7initial eligibility list shall be posted by the commission 8showing the final grades of the candidates without reference 9to priority of time of examination and subject to claim for 10preference credit.11    (h) Preferences. The following are preferences:12        (1) Veteran preference. Persons who were engaged in 13    the military service of the United States for a period of 14    at least one year of active duty and who were honorably 15    discharged therefrom, or who are now or have been members 16    on inactive or reserve duty in such military or naval 17    service, shall be preferred for appointment to and 18    employment with the fire department of an affected 19    department.20        (2) Fire cadet preference. Persons who have 21    successfully completed 2 years of study in fire techniques 22    or cadet training within a cadet program established under 23    the rules of the Joint Labor and Management Committee 24    (JLMC), as defined in Section 50 of the Fire Department 25    Promotion Act, may be preferred for appointment to and 26    employment with the fire department.  HB4936- 71 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1        (3) Educational preference. Persons who have 2    successfully obtained an associate's degree in the field 3    of fire service or emergency medical services, or a 4    bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university 5    may be preferred for appointment to and employment with 6    the fire department.7        (4) Paramedic preference. Persons who have obtained a 8    license as a paramedic may be preferred for appointment to 9    and employment with the fire department of an affected 10    department providing emergency medical services.11        (5) Experience preference. All persons employed by a 12    district who have been paid-on-call or part-time certified 13    Firefighter II, certified Firefighter III, State of 14    Illinois or nationally licensed EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, or 15    paramedic, or any combination of those capacities may be 16    awarded up to a maximum of 5 points. However, the 17    applicant may not be awarded more than 0.5 points for each 18    complete year of paid-on-call or part-time service. 19    Applicants from outside the district who were employed as 20    full-time firefighters or firefighter-paramedics by a fire 21    protection district or municipality for at least 2 years 22    may be awarded up to 5 experience preference points. 23    However, the applicant may not be awarded more than one 24    point for each complete year of full-time service.25        Upon request by the commission, the governing body of 26    the district or in the case of applicants from outside the   HB4936- 72 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    district the governing body of any other fire protection 2    district or any municipality shall certify to the 3    commission, within 10 days after the request, the number 4    of years of successful paid-on-call, part-time, or 5    full-time service of any person. A candidate may not 6    receive the full amount of preference points under this 7    subsection if the amount of points awarded would place the 8    candidate before a veteran on the eligibility list. If 9    more than one candidate receiving experience preference 10    points is prevented from receiving all of their points due 11    to not being allowed to pass a veteran, the candidates 12    shall be placed on the list below the veteran in rank order 13    based on the totals received if all points under this 14    subsection were to be awarded. Any remaining ties on the 15    list shall be determined by lot. 16        (6) Residency preference. Applicants whose principal 17    residence is located within the fire department's 18    jurisdiction may be preferred for appointment to and 19    employment with the fire department.20        (7) Additional preferences. Up to 5 additional 21    preference points may be awarded for unique categories 22    based on an applicant's experience or background as 23    identified by the commission.24        (7.5) Apprentice preferences. A person who has 25    performed fire suppression service for a department as a 26    firefighter apprentice and otherwise meets the   HB4936- 73 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    qualifications for original appointment as a firefighter 2    specified in this Section is eligible to be awarded up to 3    20 preference points. To qualify for preference points, an 4    applicant shall have completed a minimum of 600 hours of 5    fire suppression work on a regular shift for the affected 6    fire department over a 12-month period. The fire 7    suppression work must be in accordance with Section 16.06 8    of this Act and the terms established by a Joint 9    Apprenticeship Committee included in a collective 10    bargaining agreement agreed between the employer and its 11    certified bargaining agent. An eligible applicant must 12    apply to the Joint Apprenticeship Committee for preference 13    points under this item. The Joint Apprenticeship Committee 14    shall evaluate the merit of the applicant's performance, 15    determine the preference points to be awarded, and certify 16    the amount of points awarded to the commissioners. The 17    commissioners may add the certified preference points to 18    the final grades achieved by the applicant on the other 19    components of the examination. 20        (8) Scoring of preferences. The commission shall give 21    preference for original appointment to persons designated 22    in item (1) by adding to the final grade that they receive 23    5 points for the recognized preference achieved. The 24    commission may give preference for original appointment to 25    persons designated in item (7.5) by adding to the final 26    grade the amount of points designated by the Joint   HB4936- 74 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    Apprenticeship Committee as defined in item (7.5). The 2    commission shall determine the number of preference points 3    for each category, except (1) and (7.5). The number of 4    preference points for each category shall range from 0 to 5    5, except item (7.5). In determining the number of 6    preference points, the commission shall prescribe that if 7    a candidate earns the maximum number of preference points 8    in all categories except item (7.5), that number may not 9    be less than 10 nor more than 30. The commission shall give 10    preference for original appointment to persons designated 11    in items (2) through (7) by adding the requisite number of 12    points to the final grade for each recognized preference 13    achieved. The numerical result thus attained shall be 14    applied by the commission in determining the final 15    eligibility list and appointment from the eligibility 16    list. The local appointing authority may prescribe the 17    total number of preference points awarded under this 18    Section, but the total number of preference points, except 19    item (7.5), shall not be less than 10 points or more than 20    30 points. Apprentice preference points may be added in 21    addition to other preference points awarded by the 22    commission. 23    No person entitled to any preference shall be required to 24claim the credit before any examination held under the 25provisions of this Section, but the preference shall be given 26after the posting or publication of the initial eligibility   HB4936- 75 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1list or register at the request of a person entitled to a 2credit before any certification or appointments are made from 3the eligibility register, upon the furnishing of verifiable 4evidence and proof of qualifying preference credit. Candidates 5who are eligible for preference credit shall make a claim in 6writing within 10 days after the posting of the initial 7eligibility list, or the claim shall be deemed waived. Final 8eligibility registers shall be established after the awarding 9of verified preference points. However, apprentice preference 10credit earned subsequent to the establishment of the final 11eligibility register may be applied to the applicant's score 12upon certification by the Joint Apprenticeship Committee to 13the commission and the rank order of candidates on the final 14eligibility register shall be adjusted accordingly. All 15employment shall be subject to the commission's initial hire 16background review, including, but not limited to, criminal 17history, employment history, moral character, oral 18examination, and medical and psychological examinations, all 19on a pass-fail basis. The medical and psychological 20examinations must be conducted last, and may only be performed 21after a conditional offer of employment has been extended.22    Any person placed on an eligibility list who exceeds the 23age requirement before being appointed to a fire department 24shall remain eligible for appointment until the list is 25abolished, or his or her name has been on the list for a period 26of 2 years. No person who has attained the age of 37 35 years   HB4936- 76 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1shall be inducted into a fire department, except as otherwise 2provided in this Section.3    The commission shall strike off the names of candidates 4for original appointment after the names have been on the list 5for more than 2 years.6    (i) Moral character. No person shall be appointed to a 7fire department unless he or she is a person of good character; 8not a habitual drunkard, a gambler, or a person who has been 9convicted of a felony or a crime involving moral turpitude. 10However, no person shall be disqualified from appointment to 11the fire department because of the person's record of 12misdemeanor convictions except those under Sections 11-6, 1311-7, 11-9, 11-14, 11-15, 11-17, 11-18, 11-19, 12-2, 12-6, 1412-15, 14-4, 16-1, 21.1-3, 24-3.1, 24-5, 25-1, 28-3, 31-1, 1531-4, 31-6, 31-7, 32-1, 32-2, 32-3, 32-4, 32-8, and paragraphs 16(1), (6), and (8) of subsection (a) of Section 24-1 of the 17Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, or arrest 18for any cause without conviction thereon. Any such person who 19is in the department may be removed on charges brought for 20violating this subsection and after a trial as hereinafter 21provided.22    A classifiable set of the fingerprints of every person who 23is offered employment as a certificated member of an affected 24fire department whether with or without compensation, shall be 25furnished to the Illinois State Police and to the Federal 26Bureau of Investigation by the commission.  HB4936- 77 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1    Whenever a commission is authorized or required by law to 2consider some aspect of criminal history record information 3for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and 4responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 5conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 6Illinois State Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 7Illinois, the Illinois State Police is authorized to furnish, 8pursuant to positive identification, the information contained 9in State files as is necessary to fulfill the request.10    (j) Temporary appointments. In order to prevent a stoppage 11of public business, to meet extraordinary exigencies, or to 12prevent material impairment of the fire department, the 13commission may make temporary appointments, to remain in force 14only until regular appointments are made under the provisions 15of this Section, but never to exceed 60 days. No temporary 16appointment of any one person shall be made more than twice in 17any calendar year.18    (k) A person who knowingly divulges or receives test 19questions or answers before a written examination, or 20otherwise knowingly violates or subverts any requirement of 21this Section, commits a violation of this Section and may be 22subject to charges for official misconduct.23    A person who is the knowing recipient of test information 24in advance of the examination shall be disqualified from the 25examination or discharged from the position to which he or she 26was appointed, as applicable, and otherwise subjected to   HB4936- 78 -LRB104 14846 RTM 27990 b1disciplinary actions.2(Source: P.A. 101-489, eff. 8-23-19; 102-375, eff. 8-13-21; 3102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 45-13-22.)